Utah statutes.
75-7-518.   Compromise of claims.
When a claim against a deceased settlor's estate has been presented in any
manner, the trustee may, if it appears in the best interest of the deceased
settlor's estate, compromise the claim, whether due or not due, absolute or
contingent, liquidated or unliquidated.
